Hawaii, session 2026, GM1196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the protection of
iwi kupuna (ancestral remains) is a matter of utmost cultural
and historical importance. Island burial councils play a
critical role in safeguarding burial sites and advising the
department of land and natural resources in decisions affecting
Native Hawaiian ancestral remains. However, the effectiveness
of the councils has been limited by persistent vacancies,
uncompensated service, and insufficient staff support. These
challenges are particularly severe on less populated islands,
where councils often fail to meet quorum, preventing lineal and
cultural descendants from having a meaningful voice in decisions
about the treatment of iwi kupuna and exercising their right to
self-determination. Council members are further required to
attend lengthy meetings and engage in consultations for
inadvertent discoveries within their moku (region), adding to
these constraints.
2026-3455 HB2104 CDl HMSO
iiiKiiniiNiimHiniiii

Page 2 2104
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
The legislature further finds that these constraints
undermine the councils' capacity to fulfill their statutory
responsibilities, delay decision-making, and frustrate Native
Hawaiian families and communities who seek the respectful
treatment of iwi kupuna.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen the
island burial councils by:
(1) Extending the time to fill vacancies that occur during
a council member's term;
(2) Providing per diem compensation in the form of a
stipend for council members representing geographic
regions to improve recruitment and retention; and
(3) Adjusting the councils' quorum for business to be a
majority of the appointed council members, but no
fewer than three members.
SECTION 2. Section 6E-43.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (b) to read:
"(b) Appointment of members to the councils shall be made
by the governor, in accordance with section 26-34 and subsection
(a), from lists for each council submitted by the department and
2026-3455 HB2104 CDl HMSO
niiniiiniiliiiBiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the office of Hawaiian affairs. Lists to fill vacancies on the
councils shall be submitted as follows:
(1) For vacancies attributable to the expiration of terms,
the list shall be submitted on the first business day
of December before the expiration of the terms, except
as provided in subsection (c); and
(2) For a vacancy that occurs during a council
[rcprcoGntativG’□] member's term, the list shall be
submitted within [thirty-buoincoo] seventy-five
calendar days after the vacancy occurs, except as
provided in subsection (c)."
2. By amending subsections (e) and (f) to read:
"(e) The department, in consultation with the councils,
office of Hawaiian affairs, representatives of development and
large landowner interests, and appropriate Hawaiian
organizations, such as Hui Malama I Na Kupuna 0 Hawai‘i Nei,
shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out
the purposes of this section. The council members shall serve
without [componoation,] salary, but shall be reimbursed for
necessary expenses incurred during the performance of their
duties. Council members appointed to represent geographic
2026-3455 HB2104 CDl HMSO


Page 4 2104
H.B. NO.
H.D, 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
regions may receive a stipend for each day of attendance at a
duly noticed meeting, paid by the office of Hawaiian affairs.
The stipend amount, process, and eligibility reguirements shall
be determined by the board of trustees of the office of Hawaiian
affairs. In addition, council members shall be reimbursed for
necessary expenses incurred during the performance of their
duties. The councils shall be a part of the department for
administrative purposes.
(f) The councils shall hold meetings and acquire
information as they deem necessary and shall communicate their
findings and recommendations to the department. Notwithstanding
section 92-3, whenever the location and description of burial
sites are under consideration, the councils may hold closed
meetings. A majority of all members appointed to [whieh] each
council [-ie—shall constitute a quorum to do
businessf—]; provided that no fewer than three members shall
constitute a quorum to do business. Concurrence of a majority
of the members present at a meeting shall be necessary to make
any action of a council valid."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-3455 HB2104 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3455 HB2104 CDl HMSO 5

2104
H.B. NO
I b
w
o
o b
APPROVED this Sth day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2104, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2104, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
173-26